Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,113
Advance for expenses.

(MBCA 8.53) (a) A corporation may, before final disposition of a proceeding, advance funds to pay for or reimburse expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding by an individual who is a party to the proceeding because that individual is a member of the board of directors if the director delivers to the corporation a signed written undertaking of the director to repay any funds advanced (1) if the director is not entitled to mandatory indemnification under section 21-2,112 and (2) it is ultimately determined under section 21-2,114 or 21-2,115 that the director is not entitled to indemnification.

(b) The undertaking required by subdivision (a) of this section must be an unlimited general obligation of the director but need not be secured and may be accepted without reference to the financial ability of the director to make repayment.

(c) Authorizations under this section shall be made:

(1) By the board of directors:

(i) If there are two or more qualified directors, by a majority vote of all the qualified directors, a majority of whom shall for such purpose constitute a quorum, or by a majority of the members of a committee consisting solely of two or more qualified directors appointed by such a vote; or

(ii) If there are fewer than two qualified directors, by the vote necessary for action by the board in accordance with subsection (c) of section 21-299, in which authorization directors who are not qualified directors may participate; or

(2) By the shareholders, but shares owned by or voted under the control of a director who at the time is not a qualified director may not be voted on the authorization.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 113;

Laws 2017, LB35, § 16.